District of Columbia statutes.
20-406

Unsupervised personal representative.

A personal representative appointed without court supervision having been ordered, and any other personal representative except during any period for which court supervision has been ordered, is not subject to continuing court supervision except as provided in section 20-107 or otherwise in this title, and is not subject to sections of this title applicable only to supervised personal representatives or estates.

History

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(t), 42 DCR 63

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-406.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-401.